test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-leeqji_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - lēʼji: # Noun 188 'eng /est mineja/fin' - full paradigm
     lēʼji+N+Sg+Nom: [lēʼji, lēji]
     lēʼji+N+Sg+Gen: [lēʼjiz, lējiz]
     lēʼji+N+Sg+Par: [lēʼjizt, lējizt]
     lēʼji+N+Sg+Dat: [lēʼjizõn, lējizõn]
     lēʼji+N+Sg+Ins: [lēʼjizõks, lējizõks]
     lēʼji+N+Sg+Ill: [lēʼjizõ, lējizõ]
     lēʼji+N+Sg+Ela: [lēʼjizõst, lējizõst]
     lēʼji+N+Pl+Nom: [lēʼjid, lējid]
     lēʼji+N+Pl+Gen: [lēʼjid, lējid]
     lēʼji+N+Pl+Par: [lēʼjidi, lējidi]
     lēʼji+N+Pl+Dat: [lēʼjidõn, lējidõn]
     lēʼji+N+Pl+Ins: [lēʼjidõks, lējidõks]
     lēʼji+N+Pl+Ill: [lēʼjiž, lējiž]
     lēʼji+N+Pl+Ela: [lēʼjisti, lējisti]
